Illinois, session 104th, SB177.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Solid Waste Planning and Recycling Act is 5amended by adding Section 14 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 15/14 new)7    Sec. 14. Plastic bag reduction.8    (a) In this Section:9    "Carryout bag" means a bag that is provided by a store or 10food service business to a customer for the purpose of 11transporting groceries, prepared foods, or retail goods. 12"Carryout bag" does not include:13        (1) a bag used solely to contain or wrap uncooked 14    meat, fish, or poultry;15        (2) a bag used solely to package loose items such as 16    fruits, vegetables, nuts, coffee, grains, baked goods, 17    candy, greeting cards, flowers, or small hardware items;18        (3) a bag used solely to contain live animals, such as 19    fish or insects, sold in a pet store;20        (4) a bag used solely to contain food that is sliced or 21    prepared to order, including, but not limited to, soup or 22    hot food;23        (5) a laundry, dry cleaning, or garment bag;  SB0177- 2 -LRB104 07380 BDA 17420 b1        (6) a bag provided by a pharmacy to carry prescription 2    drugs;3        (7) a newspaper bag; and4        (8) any bag similar to those listed above, as 5    determined by the Agency by rule, regulation, or guidance.6    "Food service business" means a business that sells or 7provides food for consumption on or off the business' 8premises. "Food service business" includes, but is not limited 9to, any restaurant, cafe, delicatessen, coffee shop, 10convenience store, grocery store, vending truck or cart, food 11truck, movie theater, business cafeteria, or institutional 12cafeteria such as those operated by or on behalf of a 13governmental entity.14    "Grocery store" means a self-service retail establishment 15that occupies at least 2,500 square feet and that sells 16household foodstuffs for off-site consumption, including, but 17not limited to, fresh produce, meat, poultry, fish, deli 18products, dairy products, canned foods, dry foods, beverages, 19baked foods, and prepared foods. "Grocery store" does not 20include an establishment that handles only prepackaged food 21that does not require time or temperature controls for food 22safety.23    "Hemp product" means a finished product with a delta-9 24tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than 0.3% that 25is derived from or made by processing a hemp plant or hemp 26plant part and prepared in a form that is available for   SB0177- 3 -LRB104 07380 BDA 17420 b1commercial sale.2    "Plastic" means a synthetic material made from linking 3monomers through a chemical reaction to create an organic 4polymer chain that can be molded or extruded at high heat into 5various solid forms and retain their defined shapes during 6their life cycle and after disposal.7    "Reusable carryout bag" means a carryout bag that:8        (1) is made of polypropylene, PET nonwoven fabric, 9    nylon, cloth, a hemp product, or another machine-washable 10    fabric;11        (2) has stitched handles; and12        (3) is designed and manufactured for multiple reuses.13    "Single-use paper carryout bag" means a carryout bag made 14of paper that is not a reusable carryout bag.15    "Single-use plastic carryout bag" means a carryout bag 16made of plastic that is not a reusable carryout bag.17    "Store" means a grocery store, convenience store, liquor 18store, pharmacy, drug store, or other retail establishment.19    (b) Beginning 18 months after the effective date of this 20amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly:21        (1) no store or food service business shall provide or 22    sell a single-use plastic carryout bag to a customer; and23        (2) no grocery store shall provide or sell a 24    single-use paper carryout bag to a customer.25    (c) The regulation of single-use plastic carryout bags and 26single-use paper carryout bags is an exclusive power and   SB0177- 4 -LRB104 07380 BDA 17420 b1function of the State. A home rule unit may not regulate 2single-use plastic carryout bags or single-use paper carryout 3bags. This Section is a denial and limitation of home rule 4powers and functions under subsection (h) of Section 6 of 5Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.